Utah statutes.
17-52-207.   Election of officers under optional plan.
If an optional plan is adopted by voters at an election under Section
17-52-206, the elected county officers specified in the plan shall be elected
at the next regular general election following the election under Section
17-52-206, according to the procedure and schedule established under Title
20A, Election Code, for the election of county officers.
